Hawaii, session 2026, GM1162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the department of
land and natural resources (department) division of boating and
ocean recreation is responsible for ocean recreation management
in state ocean waters, among other responsibilities. Public
safety and marine natural resources can be affected by a variety
of environmental factors and emerging ocean recreation
technologies, some of which may change rapidly and frequently.
This Act is part of a comprehensive ocean recreation management
package put forth by the department to ensure effective natural
resource protection by providing better management and
enforcement tools.
The legislature further finds that the department is also
not adequately funded to proactively address impacts of rules-
based commercial activity, such as overcrowding and marine
ecosystem damage, forcing a more reactionary approach that does
little to address issues.
2026-3487 HB649 GDI HMSO

Page 2 649
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to revise fee and
permitting provisions applicable to commercial ocean operators.
SECTION 2. Section 200-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
S "§200-10 Permits and fees for state small boat harbors
coastal areas, and ocean waters; permit transfers. (a) No
person shall moor a vessel in a state small boat harbor without:
(1) First obtaining [a] written authorization
from the department; [and]
(2) Being the owner of the vessel[—]; and
■ (3) Paying appropriate fees set by subsection (c).
(b) In order to obtain [a-] any use permit or [a] use
permit renewal, the owner of a vessel shall provide, at the
owner's own expense:
(1) A marine surveyor's inspection or a vessel inspection
by the department, no more than two years old,
certifying that the vessel has been inspected and
fulfills the requirements set by the department;
(2) Documentation that the person is the owner of the
vessel. The documentation shall meet requirements
established by the department; and
2026-3487 HB649 CDl HMSO 2

Page 3 649
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(3) Satisfactory proof that the person has attained the
age of eighteen years prior to obtaining [a] any use
permit or being placed on the waitlist for [a] any use
permit.
(c) [?he] A permittee shall pay [fftearage] fees to the
department for a use permit that shall be based on but not
limited to the [use of the veoocl,—feha—vassal-'s ef-feafe—on--the
harbor^—use o-f- faciliticoz—and--the ■ cost -o-f -admini-at-cring the
mearing—impact of the permitted activity on natural
resources, impact of the activity on public access to and use of
state boating facilities and waters of the State, and the cost
of administering the small boat harbor and coastal areas
programs; provided that:
(1) Except for commercial maritime activities in which a
tariff is established by the department of
transportation, moorage fees shall be established by
appraisal by a state-licensed appraiser approved by
the department;
(2) For commercial maritime activities in which a tariff
is established by the harbors division of the
department of transportation, the department may adopt
2026-3487 HB649 GDI HMSO

Page 4 649
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
the published tariff of the harbors division of the
department of transportation or establish the moorage
fee by appraisal by a state-licensed appraiser
approved by the department;
(3) An application fee shall be collected when applying
for [moorage in otato small boat-harbors] any use
permit and shall thereafter be collected annually when
the application is renewed; provided that the
application fee shall be set by the department;
(4) If a recreational vessel is used as a place of
principal habitation, the permittee shall pay, in lieu
of the moorage fee required by paragraph (1), a
monthly liveaboard fee that shall be two times the
moorage fee that would otherwise be assessed for a
vessel of the same size;
(5) If [a-vessel -is used for commercial purposes from the
vessel's permitted mooring,] the permittee is carrying
passengers for hire, the permittee shall pay[7—in lieu
of the moorage fee required by paragraph—HH-r] a
monthly fee that shall be the greater of:
2026-3487 HB649 CDl HMSO

Page 5
H.B. NO.
hSi
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(A) Three per cent of the gross revenues derived from
the use of the vessel;
(B) $1.50 per passenger carried for hire; or
(C) Two times the moorage fee that would otherwise be
assessed for a recreational vessel of the same
size;
provided further that if a permittee is using a vessel
for commercial purposes from the vessel's permitted
mooring^ the fee required by this paragraph shall be
in lieu of the moorage fee required by paragraph (1)
for that vessel;
(6) The department is authorized to assess and collect
utility fees, including but not limited to electrical
and water charges, and common-area maintenance fees in
state small boat harbors; and
(7) All fees established by appraisal pursuant to this
subsection shall be set at fair market value.
(d) The department shall not renew or issue [a] any use
permit to a person who is not the owner of the vessel [whieh]
that is moored or [whieh] th^ the person desires to moor in a
state small boat harbor. No use permit may be transferred
2026-3487 HB649 GDI HMSO
iMiniiiniiiiniiiiiiHin

Page 6 649
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
unless specifically provided by law. Any individual who is an
owner of a vessel used for commercial purposes, including
commercial fishing as a principal means of livelihood, and w^
possesses a valid commercial use permit [or commercial
permit,—or be-th,J in accordance with the rules adopted by the
chairperson pursuant to chapter 91, may transfer ownership of
the vessel from personal ownership to corporate or other
business ownership without terminating the right to moor or
operate the vessel under the commercial use permit [or permits].
[The] Any existing use permit or permits held by the
transferring individual shall be reissued in the name of the
transferee corporation or other business entity.
(e) [For the—purposes of this section,—^'person" moans any
individual/—fi-rffty—partnership,—corporation,—trust,—ess-oe-i-ation,
je in t--ven t-u-re?—organization,—i-n-o-titution,—er^-aey—ether—iegei
entity,—and "owner”—i-neludcs the legal owner of' a voosci whore
there is no seourifey interest hold by anyone on thO"-vessel,—a
buyer-under—-a—purcheee- money eeeurity ■ i-ntorost,—ar-dehter—ueder
any security interest,—a—defftiee—eherterer—of—a-^veeeeh7—or—a
loesoc ■■er—chartcrcr--of a vosool under a—ieaee-or charter which
provides the- ■lessee-er charterer—with exclusive right to
2026-3487 HB649 CDl HMSO

Page 7 649
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
pooaGOoion■of-tho vgoooI to the oxcluoion of the leoaor or the
poroon--from—wh-om--thG vgoogI ia chartorGd.-- "ControllGd group"
moano paront-ouboidiary corporations^—brother-aiator
corporationo,—or conatructivo owner.-- "Tranafor" ine-ludco any
change in-eentrolz—by—whatever mcana^—©^—any—ent-tby-^bbat—owns—ar
controla,—directly or indirectly^—a uac pcnnib;] No permittee
shall be allowed to moor a leased vessel in a berth unless the
terms of the lease are set at fair market value. [A "legal
owner"—includea a per-aon- who holds unencumbered titlG—to—a
vcaacl or is a secured party under a security intereab-in-thc
vessel.] An owner who is issued a mooring permit [to-moor a
vessel- in a state small boat harbor] shall notify the department
in writing of a transfer of interest or possession in the vessel
within seven days of transfer.
(f) Any person who owns an interest in a corporation or
other business entity or is part of a controlled group
possessing a valid commercial use permit issued by the
department, in accordance with rules adopted by the chairperson
pursuant to chapter 91, may transfer any or all stock or other
interest to another person without terminating the right of the
corporation or business entity to retain or renew its commercial
2026-3487 HB649 CDl HMSO 7

Page 8 H.B. NO.
hSi
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
use permit or any other use permit issued to it by the
department; provided that:
(1) The corporation or business entity has been engaged in
the same commercial vessel activity, as defined in
section 200-9, for a minimum of one year;
(2) The seller shall pay the department a business
transfer fee based on the passenger-carrying capacity
of the vessels owned or operated by the corporation or
business entity as provided by rules adopted by the
chairperson pursuant to chapter 91, except for
transfers of stock or interest in a corporation or
other business entity between spouses or first-
generation lineal descendants; and
(3) In the case of a controlled group, the transferee
IS shall retain eighty per cent control of the
transferor.
Any person possessing a commercial us^ permit shall be
required to meet minimum revenue standards, as set forth in
rules adopted by the department pursuant to chapter 91, as a
condition of retaining or renewing the commercial u£e permit.
2026-3487 HB649 GDI HMSO


Page 9
H.B. NO.
hSi
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
When an application for renewal of a commercial use permit
is made at least sixty days before the expiration of
the commercial use permit, the department shall review the
application and, within thirty days of receipt of the
application, shall renew the commercial use permit or notify the
applicant that the application is incomplete or cannot be
renewed and explain any reasons for nonrenewal. Within thirty
days of receipt of the applicant's amended application, the
department shall [e-ithe^] renew the commercial use permit or
notify the applicant that the commercial use permit will not be
renewed.
If the holder of a commercial use permit fails to timely
[obtrai-n- -renewal of a] renew a commercial use permit, the holder
[o£-^he- permit shall automatically bo granted a] may make a
written request to the department for a one-time thirty-day
extension from the date of the existing commercial use permit's
expiration to obtain a commercial use permit renewal. Ar^
extension request shall be received by the department no later
than the expiration date of the commercial use permit.
2026-3487 HB649 CDl HMSO

Page 10 649
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(g) The department may designate moorage space within
state small boat harbors to accommodate commercial fishing
vessels and transient vessels.
(h) All revenues from the foregoing operations shall be
deposited in the boating special fund.
(i) As used in this section:
"Controlled group” means parent-subsidiary corporations,
brother-sister corporations, or constructive owner.
"Legal owner" includes a person who holds unencumbered
title to a vessel or is a secured party under a security
interest in the vessel.
"Owner" includes the legal owner of a vessel where there is
no security interest held by anyone on the vessel, a buyer under
a purchase money security interest, a debtor under any security
interest, a demise charterer of a vessel, or a lessee or
charterer of a vessel under a lease or charter which provides
the lessee or charterer with exclusive right to possession of
the vessel to the exclusion of the lessor or the person from
whom the vessel is chartered.
2026-3487 HB649 CDl HMSO 10
MBiiiiiiiinniim

Page 11
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"Person" means any individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, trust, association, joint venture, organization,
institution, or any other legal entity.
"Transfer" includes any change in control, by whatever
means, of any entity that owns or controls, directly or
indirectly, a use permit."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3487 HB649 CDl HMSO 11

H.B. NO 649
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 29th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 649, HD1,SD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We heteby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 649, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
172-26